Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201653-186.01
Consumption of liquor in public
places; license required; exceptions; violations; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person owning, operating, managing,
or conducting any dance hall, restaurant, cafe, or club or any place open
to the general public to permit or allow any person to consume alcoholic liquor
upon the premises except as permitted by a license issued for such premises
pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to consume alcoholic liquor
in any dance hall, restaurant, cafe, or club or any place open to the general
public except as permitted by a license issued for such premises pursuant
to the act.

(3) This section shall not apply to a retail licensee while lawfully
engaged in the catering of alcoholic beverages or to limousines or buses operated under section 60-6,211.08.

(4) Any person violating subsection (1) of this section shall, upon
conviction thereof, be subject to the penalties contained in section 53-1,100.

(5) Any person violating subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty
of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1965, c. 318, § 1, p. 885;

Laws 1978, LB 386, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 67;

Laws 1991, LB 454, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB281, § 2.